hu: Tűtartó tok formátuma: Könyv/mappa; Doboz; Kagylóhéj; Tasak; Feltekerhető tok; Henger; Pénztárca; Cipzáras tok; Egyéb
pt-BR: Estojo para agulhas formato: Livro/fichário; Caixa; Estojo concha; Bolsa; Estojo enrolável; Tubo; Carteira; Estojo com zíper; Outro
fr: Format de l’étui à aiguilles: Livre/étui; Boîte; Boîtier à double coque; Pochette; Étui déroulant; Tube; Portefeuille; Étui zippé; Autre
en: Needle case format: Book/folio; Box; Clamshell; Pouch; Roll-up case; Tube; Wallet; Zip case; Other
vi: Định dạng hộp kim: Dạng sách/kẹp; Hộp; Vỏ sò; Túi đựng; Hộp cuộn tròn; Ống; Ví; Hộp có khóa kéo; Khác
fi: Neulakotelon muoto: Kirja/kansio; Laatikko; Simpukka; Pussi; Rullattava kotelo; Putkilo; Lompakko; Vetoketjukotelo; Muu
ru: Формат футляра для игл: Книга/фолио; Коробка; Раскладной футляр; Мешочек; Сворачивающийся чехол; Тубус; Кошелек; Чехол на молнии; Другой
el: Μορφή θήκης βελόνας: Βιβλίο/ντοσιέ; Κουτί; Clamshell; Θήκη; Θήκη σε ρολό; Σωλήνας; Πορτοφόλι; Θήκη με φερμουάρ; Άλλο
hr-HR: Format kutije igle: Knjiga/folio; Kutija; Preklopna kutija (clamshell); Torbica; Sklopiva torbica u obliku role; Tuba; Etui; Torbica s patentnim zatvaračem; Ostalo
cs: Formát pouzdra na jehly: Kniha/desky; Krabička; Skořepinové pouzdro; Kapsička; Rolovací pouzdro; Tuba; Peněženka; Pouzdro na zip; Ostatní
it: Formato del portaghi: Libro/cartella; Scatola; A conchiglia; Bustina; Astuccio arrotolabile; Tubo; Portafoglio; Astuccio con zip; Altro
bg-BG: Формат на калъф за игли: Книга/фолио; Кутия; Тип мида; Торбичка; Навиващ се калъф; Тръба; Портфейл; Калъф с цип; Друго
ko: 바늘 케이스 형식: 북/폴리오; 박스; 클램쉘; 파우치; 롤업 케이스; 튜브; 지갑형; 지퍼 케이스; 기타
tr: İğne kutusu formatı: Kitap/folyo; Kutu; Kapaklı kılıf; Kese; Rulo kılıf; Tüp; Cüzdan; Fermuarlı kılıf; Diğer
es: Formato del estuche para agujas: Libro/portafolio; Caja; Estuche tipo concha; Funda; Estuche enrollable; Tubo; Cartera; Estuche con cremallera; Otro
th: รูปแบบกล่องใส่เข็ม: หนังสือ/แฟ้มกระเป๋า; กล่อง; ฝาพับ; ซอง; เคสม้วนพับ; หลอด; กระเป๋าพับ; เคสซิป; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Format etuija za igle: Knjiga/mapa; Škatla; Školjkasto odpiranje (clamshell); Torbica; Zvit etui; Tuba; Denarnica; Etui z zadrgo; Drugo
zh-TW: 針盒形式: 書本/對折式; 盒子; 翻蓋; 收納袋; 捲筒收納袋; 管狀; 皮夾式; 拉鍊盒; 其他
sv: Format på nålfodral: Bok/mapp; Ask; Clamshell; Påse; Rullfodral; Rör; Plånboksmodell; Blixtlåsfodral; Övrigt
ja: 針ケース形式: ブック/フォリオ; ボックス; クラムシェル; ポーチ; ロールアップケース; チューブ; ウォレット; ジップケース; その他
ro-RO: Formatul cutiei pentru ace: Carte/mapă; Cutie; Tip scoică (clamshell); Săculeț; Husă tip rulou; Tub; Portofel; Husă cu fermoar; Altele
nl: Naald etui formaat: Boek/map; Doos; Clamshell; Zakje; Oprolbare etui; Buis; Mapje; Etui met rits; Anders
sk-SK: Formát puzdra na ihly: Kniha/zakladač; Škatuľka; Vyklápacie (Clamshell); Vrecko; Zrolovateľné puzdro; Tuba; Peňaženka; Puzdro na zips; Iné
pt-PT: Formato de caixa interna de agulha: Livro/fólio; Caixa; Clamshell; Bolsa; Estojo de enrolar; Tubo; Carteira; Estojo com fecho; Outro
lt-LT: Adatų dėklo formatas: Knyga / aplankas; Dėžutė; Sąvarinis dėklas; Maišelis; Suvyniojamas dėklas; Vamzdelis; Piniginė; Dėklas su užtrauktuku; Kita
da: Format for nåleetui: Bog/folio; Æske; Muslingeskal; Pose; Rulleetui; Rør; Pung; Etui med lynlås; Andet
nb: Format på nåleetui: Bok/mappe; Eske; Kamskjell; Pung; Rulleetui; Rør; Lommebok; Etui med glidelås; Annet
de: Format des Nadeletuis: Buch/Mappe; Box; Klappetui; Beutel; Rolletui; Röhre; Wallet; Reißverschlussetui; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 针盒格式: 书本/对折式; 盒式; 翻盖式; 袋式; 卷筒式; 管式; 钱包式; 拉链盒; 其他
pl: Format etui na igły: Książeczka/etui składane; Pudełko; Zatrzaskowe; Woreczek; Zwijane etui; Tuba; Portfel; Etui na zamek; Inne